Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2735
Bonds; securities; investment authorized.

Bonds issued pursuant to sections 18-2724 to 18-2736 shall be securities in which all public officers and instrumentalities of the state and all political subdivisions, insurance companies, trust companies, banks, savings and loan associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, personal representatives, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds shall be securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any officer or instrumentality of this state or any political subdivision for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of this state or any political subdivision thereof is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

Laws 1993, LB 732, § 12.